Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Equal Employment Opportunity

45.550.
Title.

KRS

45.560

to

45.640

shall be known as the Kentucky Equal Employment Opportunity Act of 1978.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

344.040

,
KRS

45.550

to

45.560

, Kentucky Executive Orders 77-508 and 77-831, P.L. 92-256, and
23 CFR Part 633, Subpart A, Appendix A are all in pari materia.

OAG 79-404

.

It was the legislative intent in KRS

45.550

to

45.640

to prohibit discrimination as it existed under Kentucky law, i.e., between 40 and 65 years of age in contracts.

OAG 79-404

.

45.560.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

45.570

to

45.640

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Contract” means any binding legal relationship between the Commonwealth of Kentucky and a contractor for supplies and services, including construction, or for the use of Commonwealth property, in which the parties, respectively, do not stand in the relationship of employer and employee;

“Contractor” means any prime contractor holding a contract with the Commonwealth of Kentucky government, and shall include subcontractors when the context so indicates;

“Contracting agency” means the person or persons, board, commission, court, council, governing body, employee, or official which is authorized by law to purchase or contract for supplies, materials, services, or equipment for the state;

“Subcontractor” means any person, including a corporation, partnership, or business association of any kind, who holds an agreement or purchase order to perform all or any part of the work or to make or furnish any article or service required for the performance of a negotiated contract or of a subcontract entered thereunder;

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet; and

“Equal employment opportunity job categories” means the major employment classifications described by the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, § 171, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 171, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Equal Employment Opportunity Act, KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, applies only to an employer-employee relationship. It does not reach the situation wherein under a subcontract vending machines are placed in restaurants.

OAG 82-219

.

The Equal Employment Opportunity Act, KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, relates only to equal “employment” opportunities. In other words, it involves people being hired by a contractor or subcontractor.

OAG 82-219

.

Under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, there is no direct relationship of employer and employee between the state and the person engaging in “services” since the contractor procures the “services” or hires the labor whereas, under KRS 45.700(1)(d) (now repealed), a “personal service contract” involves a direct relationship between the state and the individual or corporation who is to furnish his, her, or its personal services and the contract extends between the state and the contracting party furnishing the services, i.e., performing certain duties, professional or otherwise; accordingly, the Equal Employment Opportunity Act does not embrace personal service contracts.

OAG 83-6

.

45.565.
Administrative regulations to carry out KRS 45.560 to 45.640.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, § 178, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 178, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

45.570.
Contents of contract.

Except in contracts exempted in accordance with KRS

45.590

, all government contracting agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, any county, city, town, school district, water district, hospital district, or other political subdivision of the state shall include in every directly or indirectly publicly funded contract for supplies, materials, services, or equipment hereinafter entered into the following provisions:

During the performance of this contract, the contractor agrees as follows:

The contractor shall not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, age forty (40) and over, disability, veteran status, or national origin;

The contractor shall take affirmative action in regard to employment, upgrading, demotion, transfer, recruitment, recruitment advertising, lay-off, termination, rates of pay or other forms of compensation, and selection for training, so as to ensure that applicants are employed and that employees during employment are treated without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, age forty (40) and over, disability, veteran status, or national origin;

The contractor shall state in all solicitations or advertisements for employees placed by or on behalf of the contractor that all qualified applicants shall receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age forty (40) and over, disability, veteran status, or national origin;

The contractor shall post notices in conspicuous places, available to employees and applicants for employment, setting forth the provisions of the nondiscrimination clauses required by this section; and

The contractor shall send a notice to each labor union or representative of workers with which he has a collective bargaining agreement or other contract or understanding advising the labor union or workers’ representative of the contractor’s commitments under the nondiscrimination clauses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 331, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 2007, ch. 137, § 172, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 172, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Equal Employment Opportunity Act, KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, applies only to an employer-employee relationship. It does not reach the situation wherein under a subcontract vending machines are placed in restaurants.

OAG 82-219

.

The Equal Employment Opportunity Act, KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, relates only to equal “employment” opportunities. In other words, it involves people being hired by a contractor or subcontractor.

OAG 82-219

.

45.580.
Failure to comply with KRS 45.570 constitutes breach of contract.

Failure to comply with any of the provisions of KRS

45.570

shall constitute a material breach of the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

45.590.
Exemptions.

A contractor or subcontractor otherwise subject to the provisions of KRS

45.570

is exempt as to any affirmative action or reporting requirements if:

The contract or subcontract awarded is in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less, and the amount of the contract is not a subterfuge to avoid compliance with the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

;

The contractor or subcontractor utilizes the services of fewer than eight (8) employees during the course of the contract;

The contractor or subcontractor employs only family members or relatives;

The contractor or subcontractor employs only persons having a direct ownership interest in the business, and such interest is not a subterfuge to avoid compliance with the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

; or

The subcontract is below the second-tier level of contracts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, § 173, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 173, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

Louisville City Ordinance No. 68 deals with the same subject as this section, that of equal opportunity requirements for individuals and firms contracting with the city by requiring all such contractors to be prequalified by a local commission, while, at the same time, appearing to modify or alter the state statute by providing that no contractor shall be awarded a contract by the city requiring an expenditure in excess of $10,000 that is required to be advertised for bids under KRS Chapter 424 unless he is prequalified as an equal opportunity employer; therefore the ordinance is in contradiction to one or more of the exceptions under this section and is, as a consequence, more restrictive.

OAG 78-596

.

45.600.
Reporting compliance or breach.

Any party not otherwise exempted by KRS

45.590

and intending to submit a bid on any contract covered by the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

shall within a time frame set by the contracting agency in the bid documents submit to the contracting agency upon being declared the successful bidder:

A statement of intent to comply in full with all requirements of the Kentucky Civil Rights Act, and to submit data required by KRS

45.560

to

45.640

upon being designated the successful bidder.

A breakdown of the bidding party’s existing workforce, indicating the race, ethnicity, gender, and equal employment opportunity job category of each employee.

A breakdown of subcontracts valued at five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more, indicating specific items of work on the contract for which the contractor has submitted or intends to submit a bid to the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The reports shall be submitted in a manner as shall be prescribed by the cabinet and on forms devised by the cabinet and supplied by the contracting agency.

Within ten (10) days after the receipt of the reports, the cabinet shall determine whether the bidding party’s workforce is reflective of the percentage of available minorities and women in the area from which the bidding party’s employees are drawn. If a determination is made that the bidding party’s workforce is reflective of the percentage of available minorities and women in this drawn area, the bidding party shall be “certified” and be thereby qualified to bid on any contract covered by KRS

45.560

to

45.640

without filing additional data for a period of one (1) year.

If it is determined by the cabinet that the bidding party’s workforce reflects an underutilization of minorities or women, the bidding party and contracting agency shall be so notified, and no certification shall be issued. The bidding party shall then have the option of filing with the contracting agency and the cabinet, an affirmative action program, indicating goals and timetables for recruiting and hiring minorities or women throughout the contractors’ workforce. The cabinet shall be available, upon the request of any contractor, to furnish technical assistance in fulfilling the requirements of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

.

If the bidding party is subsequently awarded the contract being sought, failure to comply with the goals and timetables set forth in the affirmative action plan shall be an unlawful practice under KRS

45.560

to

45.640

and shall constitute a material breach of the contract.

If the cabinet determines that the submitted affirmative action program does not fulfill the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, the bidding party and contracting agency shall be so notified, and no certification shall be granted.

If the bidding party’s workforce is not reflective of the percentage of minorities or women in the drawing area and the bidding party has complied with all other affirmative action requirements in KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, the bidding party may certify by verified affidavit that the bidding party has made every reasonable effort to comply with said percentage requirements, and the bidding party shall thereafter be entitled to all the benefits of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, § 174, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 174, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) is meant to be the umbrella monitor agency for seeing that the contracts contain provisions excluding discrimination and that the contractor complies with the terms which forbid discrimination even if the contracting agency happens to be a city, a town, a county, or political subdivision of the state.

OAG 79-404

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

The Kentucky Civil Rights Act, KRS

344.010

et seq.

45.610.
Hiring minorities and women — Information required.

For the length of the contract, each contractor shall hire minorities and women from other sources within the drawing area, should the union with which he has collective bargaining agreements be unwilling to supply sufficient minorities or women to satisfy the agreed upon goals and timetables.

Each contractor shall, for the length of the contract, furnish such information as required by KRS

45.560

to

45.640

and by such rules, regulations, and orders issued pursuant thereto and will permit access to all books and records pertaining to his employment practices and work sites by the contracting agency and the cabinet for purposes of investigation to ascertain compliance with KRS

45.560

to

45.640

and such rules, regulations, and orders issued pursuant thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, § 175, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 175, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

45.620.
Action against contractor — Hiring of minority or woman contractor or subcontractor.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may investigate the employment practices of any contractor or subcontractor to determine if any of the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

have been violated. If any contractor is found by the cabinet to have engaged in an unlawful practice under KRS

45.560

to

45.640

during the course of performing under a contract or subcontract covered under KRS 45.560 to 45.640, the cabinet shall so certify to the contracting agency and such certification shall be binding upon the contracting agency unless it is reversed in the course of judicial review.

If the contractor is found to have committed an unlawful practice under KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, the contracting agency may cancel or terminate the contract, conditioned upon a program for future compliance approved by the contracting agency and the cabinet. The contracting agency may declare such a contractor ineligible to bid on further contracts with that agency until such time as the contractor complies in full with the requirements of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

.

The equal employment provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

may be met in part by a contractor by subcontracting to a minority or woman contractor or subcontractor. For the provisions of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

, a minority or woman contractor or subcontractor shall mean a business that is owned and controlled by one (1) or more persons disadvantaged by racial, ethnic, or gender circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, § 176, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 176, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

45.630.
Termination of existing employee not required, when.

Any provision of KRS

45.560

to

45.640

notwithstanding, no contractor shall be required to terminate an existing employee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 2007, ch. 137, § 177, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 177, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

45.640.
Minimum skills.

Nothing in KRS

45.560

to

45.640

shall require a contractor to hire anyone who fails to demonstrate the minimum skills required to perform a particular job.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 130, § 10, effective June 17, 1978.